District of Columbia statutes.
38-923

Repealed

Annual estimates of expenses.

Repealed.

Dec. 16, 1941, 55 Stat. 807, ch. 585, § 5
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 4036, 57 DCR 6242
1981 Ed., § 31-904.
1973 Ed., § 31-1204.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4036 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).